Evaluation and Findings Report on the Application for Certification Pursuant to Section 401 of the Federal Clean Water Act Submitted by Portland General Electric Company for the Decommissioning of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project in Clackamas County, Oregon (FERC No. 477) Pursuant to Oregon Administrative Rules Chapter 340, Division 48 Prepared by: Oregon Department of Environmental Quality 811 SW 6 th Avenue Portland, Oregon 97204
October 22, 2003
2 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Table of Contents 1.
INTRODUCTION.............................................................................................................
5 2.
REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTIFICATION .....................................................................
5 2.1 APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW ..............................................................
5 2.2 General Application of State Water Quality Standards ..........................................
2.2.1 Beneficial Uses......................................................................................................
2.2.2 Narrative and Numeric Criteria............................................................................
2.2.3 Antidegradation Policy.........................................................................................
2.2.4 Total Maximum Daily Loads (TMDLs).................................................................
6 6 7 7 7
3.
PROJECT INFORMATION AND SUMMARY OF PROJECT .......................................
7 3.1 Applicant Information .................................................................................................
3.1.1 Legal Name and Address of Project Owner (Applicant) ..................................
3.1.2 Legal Name of Owner's Official Representative ...............................................
3.1.3 Documents Filed in Support of § 401 Application ............................................
3.1.4 Notification of Complete Application .................................................................
7 7 7 8 8
3.2 Project Description and Proposed Decommissioning ...........................................
8 3.2.1 Waters of the State Impacted by Project..........................................................
10 3.2.2 Adjacent Land Use and Ownership ..................................................................
11 3.2.3 Bull Run Project Facilities .................................................................................
11 4.
DEQ EVALUATION OF COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE STANDARDS............
14 4.1 Evaluation of Compliance with State Water Quality Standards ..........................
4.1.1 Water Quality Standards of Potential Concern ...............................................
4.1.2 Sediment ..............................................................................................................
4.1.3 Turbidity ...............................................................................................................
4.1.4 Biocriteria.............................................................................................................
4.1.5 Temperature ........................................................................................................
4.1.6 Toxic Substances................................................................................................
14 14 14 20 23 25 29
4.2 Evaluation of Compliance with Sections 301, 302, 303, 306,and 307 of the Federal Clean Water Act .................................................................................................
31 4.3 Evaluation of Other Appropriate Requirements of State Law .............................
4.3.1 Division of State Lands ......................................................................................
4.3.2 Department of Fish and Wildlife ........................................................................
4.3.3 Department of Land Conservation and Development ....................................
4.3.4 Department of Environmental Quality..............................................................
4.3.5 Department of Water Resources.......................................................................
3 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
31 31 31 32 32 32
5.0 PUBLIC COMMENT ...................................................................................................
33 5.1 Issuance of Public Notice, Opportunity to Comment ...........................................
33 5.2 Summary of Public Comment Received.................................................................
33 6.
CONCLUSIONS AND RECOMMENDATION FOR CERTIFICATION........................
34 7.
REFERENCES..............................................................................................................
35 APPENDIX A: PUBLIC COMMENT RECEIVED ON DRAFT § 401 CERTIFICATE AND EVALUATIONS AND FINDINGS REPORT.....................................................................
36 1.
Comment from the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service:.................................................
36 2.
Comment from Don Mench and Christy Slovacek:.................................................
38 3.
Comment from Northwest Environmental Defense Center: ..................................
39
4 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
1.
INTRODUCTION Portland General Electric's current license for operati ng the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project on the Sandy River and tributaries in Oreg on, will expire on November 16, 2004.
In place of apply ing for a new operating license, on November 21, 2002, PGE submitted a Surrender Application to FERC.
Following is a brief history of the events leading to the Surrender Application.
On September 9, 1998, Portland General Electric (PGE) filed a letter of intention to renew its operating license for the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC).
However, by the spring of 1999, PGE had decided not pursue a license renewal, and on May 26, 1999, publicly announced its intent to decommission the project.
On October 24, 2002, PGE entered into a Settlement Agreement with 22 other parties (referred to as the Decommissioning Work Group, or DWG) including local, state and federal agencies as well as non -governmental organizations, to decommission its Bull Run Hydroelectric Project (FERC Project 477 ).
Following this agreement, PGE filed a Surrender Application, proposing to decommission the project facilities in accordance with the Settlement Agreement .
The Surrender Application requests a license extension from November 16, 2004 through November 16, 2017, continuing electric generation until the Little Sandy Dam is removed in 2008.
PGE will then continue monitoring for geomorphologic and water quality conditions through out the project area until post-dam- removal channel conditions near and below the dam have returned to baseline-type conditions .
On November 7, 2003, PGE submitted an application for water quality certification under Section 401 of the Clean Water Act (§ 401) for the proposed decommissioning of the Bull Run Project.
The record generated in the process of reviewing the § 401 application, all supplemental information submitted by the Applicant , and all materials received as part of the public review process, are considered part of the record regarding the § 401 application.
This report documents the Department of Environmental Quality's (DEQ) evaluation of the § 401 application, its consideration of public comment, and its findings for § 401 certification and § 401 conditions .
2.
REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTIFICATION 2.1 Applicable Federal and State Law Section 401 of the Federal Clean Water Act (33 USC §1341; Clean Water Act; CWA) establishes requirements for State certification of proposed projects or activities that may result in any discharge of pollutants to navigable waters.
Before a Federal agency may issue a permit or license for any project that may result in any discharge of pollutants to navigable waters, the state must certify that the pro posed project will comply with applicable provisions of Sections 301, 302, 303, 306, and 307 of the Clean Water Act and any state regulations , including state water quality standards, adopted to implement these sections.
The state is further authorized to condition any granted certificate to assure compliance with state water quality standards and other appropriate water quality-related requirements of state law.
DEQ is the agency of the State of Oregon designated to carry out the certification functions prescribed by § 401 of the Clean Water Act for state waters.
DEQ must act on an application for certification in a manner consistent with the following federal and state requirements: Federal Requirements: Sections 301, 302, 303, 306, and 307 of the Federal Clean Water Act.
These sections prescribe effluent limitations, water quality related effluent limitations, water quality standards and implementation plans, national standards of performanc e for new sources, and toxic and pretreatment effluent standards.
5 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
State Requirements: OAR 340-041 and 340-048-0005 to 340-048-0040.
These rules were adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission (EQC) to prescribe the state's water quality standards (OAR 340- 041) and procedures for receiving, evaluating, and taking final action upon a § 401 -certification application (OAR 340-0 48).
The rules include requirements for general information such as the location and characteristics of the project, as well as confirmation that the project complies with appropriate local land use plans and any other requirements of state law that have a direct or indirect relationship to water quality.
ORS 468B.040 This state statute pres cribes procedural requirements and findings with which DEQ must comply as it makes a decision on a § 401-certification application.
This statute makes reference to the federal law requirements, state water quality rules, and other requirements of state law regarding hydroelectric projects.
ORS 197.180(1) This statute requires state agency actions to be consistent with acknowledged land use plans and implementing regulations, or if a plan is not acknowledged, compatible with state land use goals.
Findings must support the state agenc y action.
ORS 543A This statute establishes procedures for coordination among state agencies in the reauthorization of federally licensed hydroelectric projects, including state certification of water quality.
EQC rules identify the information that must be included in an application for § 401 certification [OAR 340-048 -0020(2)].
The application together with information provided during public comment and interagency coordination is essential to support the following det erminations to be made by DEQ pursuant to § 401 of the Federal Clean Water Act and state law: · · · The determination of whether to issue or deny certification.
The determination of conditions which are appropriate to include in any granted certificate.
Devel opment of findings as required by ORS 468B.040 and ORS 197.180(1).
2.2 General Application of State Water Quality Standards Oregon water quality standards are contained in Oregon Administrative Rule Division 41 entitled "State-Wide Wat er Quality Management Plan: Beneficial Standards, and Treatment Criteria for Oregon."
The water quality standards composed of three elements: beneficial uses, numeric and narrative criteria, antidegradation policy , and are further implemented through Total Maximum as applicable.
The role of each of these is explained below.
(OAR) Chapter 340, Uses, Policies, in Division 41 are and the Daily Loads (TMDLs)
2.2.1 Beneficial Uses The Federal Clean Water Act and Oregon water quality standards are structured to require that water quality be protected and maintained so that existing and potential beneficial uses of public waters are not impaired or precluded by degraded water quality.
The regulatory approach used is to: (1) identify beneficial uses that are recognized as significant with regard to water quality protection; (2) develop and adopt standards of quality for significant water quality parameters in order to define the quality that is necessary to protect the identified beneficial uses; (3) establish and enforce case-by -c ase discharge limitations for each source that is permitted to discharge treated wastes into public waters in order to assure that water quality standards are not violated and beneficial uses are not impaired; and (4) establish and implement "best management practices" for a variety of "land management" activities to minimize their contribution to water quality standards violations or impairment of beneficial uses.
6 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Beneficial uses to be protected have been identified generally for each river basin in Oregon and specifically for significant stream reaches within some basins.
The State's designated beneficial uses to be protected in the Sandy Basin, where the Bull Run Project is located, are listed in OAR 340 -041- 0482.
These uses include public, private domestic, and industrial water supply; irrigation; livestock watering; anadromous fish passage; salmonid fish rearing; salmonid fish spawning; resident fish 
2.2.2 Narrative and Numeric Criteria Generally, the assumption is made that if water quality meets the numeric and narrative criteria for the most sensitive beneficial use, then the criteria is fully protective of all the beneficial us es. Water quality standard criteria have been adopted for water quality parameters that are most significant or useful in regulating pollution.
These criteria take the form of both numeric limits and narrative statements and have been established based on best available information at the time they were adopted.
Development of water quality standards is a continuing process.
As new information becomes available, standards for additional parameters may be added, and existing numeric and narrative criteri a may be revised to better reflect the intent of protection of the identified beneficial uses.
2.2.3 Antidegradation Policy Oregon's antidegradation policy (OAR 340 -041- 0026) applies to all surface waters.
In the case of bodies of water that meet water quality standards, it provides for the maintenance of existing water quality.
Specifically, the policy states that the existing quality of high quality waters (i.e., waters meeting water quality standards) shall be maintained and protected unless the Environmental Quality Commission makes certain rigorous findings of need.
For water qualitylimited waters, water quality may in no circumstances be lowered; that is, these waters have a nondegradation status.
2.2.4 Total Maximum Daily Loads (TMDLs) DEQ also develops, and the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency approves, TMDLs for waters listed as water quality-limited pursuant to CWA § 303(d).
A TMDL identifies the amount of a specific pollutant that a water body can receive and still meet water quality standards and support the beneficial uses designated in that waterbody.
A TMDL also identifies wasteload allocations for point sources of pollutants and load allocations for non -point sources.
For a hydroelectric project located on a water quality-limited waterbody, a § 401 certification may serve as the means for implementing load allocations assigned to the project.
3.
PROJECT INFORMATION AND SUMMARY OF PROJECT 3.1 Applicant Information 3.1.1 Legal Name and Address of Project Owner (Applicant) Portlan d General Electric Company 121 SW Salmon Street Portland, OR 97204
3.1.2 Legal Name of Owner's Official Representative Julie Keil, Hydropower Relicensing Portland General Electric Company 121 SW Salmon Street Portland, OR 97204 (503) 464 -8864
7 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
3.1.3 Documents Filed in Support of § 401 Application PGE has filed the following documents in support of its § 401 application for decommissioning the Bull Run Project: · · · · Application for Non- Capacity Amendment of License Application for Surrender of License Joint Explanatory Statement in Support of Decommissioning Settlement Agreement Settlement Agreement Concerning the Removal of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project including: a) Exhibit A: Decommissioning Plan b) Exhibit B: Authorized Representatives of the Parties c) Appe ndix A: Application for Amendment of License d) Appendix B: Application for Surrender of License e) Appendix C: Draft Environmental Assessment f) Appendix D: Biological Evaluation g) Appendix E: Preliminary Determination Pursuant to Wild and Scenic Rivers Act h) Appendix F: ODSL Easement i) Appendix G: Joint Explanatory Statement j) Appendix H: Draft Memorandum of Agreement Pursuant to Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act k) Appendix : Section 106 Preliminary Finding of Effect l) Appendix J: Agreement for In stream Conversion Numerical Modeling of Sediment Transport in the Sandy River, OR, Following Removal of Marmot Dam.
Supplement to Environmental Assessment for the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project, FERC Project number 477.
Technical Report for PGE, prepared by Stillwater Sciences.
Evaluation of Geomorphic Effects of Removal of Marmot and Little Sandy Dams and Potential Impacts on Anadromous Salmonids.
Technical Report for PGE, prepared by Stillwater Sciences.
Sandy River Sediment Study Bull Run Hydroelectric Project (FERC Project number 477), Technical Report for PGE, prepared by M.F. Schaub, D.E. King, and B.K. Myers of Squier Associates
·
· ·
3.1.4 Notification of Complete Application On December 2, 2002, DEQ notified the Applicant, PGE, that it deemed the Application for § 401 Certification to be administratively complete for processing.
3.2 Project Description and Proposed Decommissioning The Bull Run Hydroelectric Project is associated with three sub -drainages in the Sandy River Basin: the Sandy River, Little Sandy River, and Bull Run River.
All three rivers originate on the west slope of Mt. Hood in Northwestern Oregon.
A diagram of the project is shown in Figure 1.
The Little Sandy flows into the Bull Run at River Mile (RM) 2.6, and the Bull Run empties into the Sandy at RM 18.4.
This major water power project consists of: two diversion dams, Marmot and Little Sandy; a complex system of canals, tunnels, and flumes; a forebay in Roslyn Lake; an intake structure; penstock; powerhouse; tailrace into the Bull Run River; and transmission lines from the powerhouse to a substation.
At the Marmot diversion dam, water is diverted from the Sandy River, and conveyed 2.7 mil es to the Little Sandy Reservoir through a series of canals and tunnels.
Water from the Little Sandy Reservoir is then transported to Roslyn Lake via a 2.8 mile flume.
A maximum 600 cfs can be diverted from the Sandy River, and a maximum of 800 cfs conveyed from the Little Sandy Dam to Roslyn Lake.
Occasionally, Roslyn Lake is supplemented 8 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
9 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
with wat er from the City of Portland.
The maximum delivery through the power house is 900 cfs. Roslyn Lake is the project forebay; the outlet of Roslyn Lake consists of two penstocks that provide water to the turbines of Bull Run Powerhouse.
Turbine water is released directly from the powerhouse into Bull Run River about 1.5 miles above the confluence of the Bull Run and Sandy Rivers.
A complete description of the project facilities and their location is included in Exhibit G of the Surrender Application (PGE, 2000).
The initial license for the Project will expire on November 16, 2004.
On November 12, 1999, PGE filed a notice of its intent not to seek a new license for the Project because it concluded that the likely cost of providing the necessary level of protection, mitigation, and enhancement for the resources affected by the Project would outweigh the economic benefit of generation at the Projec t. PGE then convened a Decommissioning Working Group ("DWG") composed of all governmental and non- governmental stakeholders in the Project to develop a Decommissioning Plan that would maximize benefits to the resources affected by the Project consistent with PGE's obligations as a regulated public utility.
These efforts were successful, and the Decommissioning Plan has been developed as part of the Settlement Agr eement , which has been signed by 23 parties.
The Settlement Agreement describes the legal context and regulatory authorities and related obligations of each of the Parties.
The Decommissioning Plan describes the project removal methodology and timeline and has been approved by each of the parties to the Settlement Agreement.
Detailed descriptions of the project removal are included in the Decommissioning Plan, so only a short summary is provided here.
The Applicant will perform certain interim measures described below, before dam removal begins.
Project removal will begin in 2007 and continue through 2009.
PGE will remove the two project dams during successive 17- week in-water work periods (July­ October ) in 2007 and 2008.
All disturbed areas will be treated in accordance with the Revegetation, Noxious Weed Control and Site Restoration Plan described in The Decommissioning Plan, (PGE, 2002).
Impacts of removal on the river channel will be monitored until the possibility of adverse effects on key resources has reached an acceptably low level.
PGE will continue to monitor for fish passage problems until channel morphology monitoring indicates that the impaired river reaches have returned to baseline type conditions .
3.2.1 Waters of the State Impacted by Project Sandy River The Sandy River is impacted by the project for about 2 miles above Marmot Dam (River Mile 30) due to impoundment , and below Marmot Dam down to its confluence with the Bull Run River (River Mile 18) by low flow due to the Marmot diversion.
Little Sandy River The Little Sandy River is impacted by impoundment or diversion for its lower 2 miles .
Bull Run River The Bull Run River is impacted by decreased flow between the mouth of the Little Sandy River and the Powerhouse (about a mile), and is impacted by increased flow from the Powerhous e to the confluence with the Sandy River (about 1.6 miles).
Roslyn Lake Roslyn Lake is a 160 acre man -made lake located on a hill above the Bull Run River.
It receives water diverted from the Sandy and Little Sandy Rivers from project flumes , and delivers it to the Bull Run River through the project powerhouse.
Roslyn Lake provides recreational opportunities, but was constructed specifically for us e as the hydro -project forebay.
10 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
3.2.2 Adjacent Land Use and Ownership Total land within the project boundary is 660 acres.
PGE owns 84% of that, 9 per cent is managed by the Bureau of Land Management (BLM), and 3 per cent is managed by the U. S. Forest Service.
Remaining lands are privately held.
Land surrounding the project area is fairly remote.
The majority of land is forested and undeveloped.
Roslyn Lake Park provides day use recreation and fishing.
Residential property is located south, east and west of Roslyn Lake.
To the north are several small farms and nurseries.
Land use is described in more detail in the " Draft Environmental Assessment ", (PGE, 2002).
3.2.3 Bull Run Project Facilities Marmot Dam Marmot Dam, a concrete- encased gravity dam, was rebuilt in 1989.
Located in the mainstem Sandy River at RM 30, it has a crest length of approximately 345 feet and rises about 47 feet above the riverbed.
The main section of the dam is 195 -feet long.
On the north end of the dam, a concrete gravity-section wing dam extends downstream to provide additional spillway, and to direct water to an intake structure.
The intake structure has a trash rack and two radial gates that regulate the diversion flow into the concrete canal system.
A concrete fish la dder facility at the south end of the dam provides upstream fish passage.
The pond area upstream from the dam has a surface area of 18 acres, but no storage capacity, because silt has accumulated to the level of the dam crest.
Marmot Dam will be removed during the summer of 2007.
Coffer dams will be constructed above and below Marmot Dam that will allow demolition of the concrete dam and remnants of an older timber crib dam structure that now sits upstream of Marmot Dam.
The concrete and timber crib structures will be removed through a combination of controlled blasting and excavation.
The upstream coffer dam will withhold summer flows, but will fail at a higher flow usually experienced with fall rains (targeted at 2500 cfs).
This will encourage maximal sediment movement during the first large storm, and assist in maintaining fish passage through out the downstream reaches after coffer dam failure.
The lower coffer dam will either be removed before the upper dam fails, or it will be designed to fail when the upper coffer dam fails.
Little Sandy Dam The Little Sandy Diversion Dam, located near RM 1.5, receives water from both the Little Sandy River and the Marmot Diversion on the Sandy River.
The dam is 15.75 feet high, with a spillway crest at elevation 702.75 feet.
Twelve-inch flashboards minimize the time that water is spilled at the Little Sandy Diversion Dam and allows the wooden flume to be filled to capacity.
The pool above Little Sandy Dam is approximately 3 acres in surface area, with no storage capacity.
Little Sandy Dam will be removed during the in -water work period in the year after Marmot Dam is removed (July- October, 2008).
Flow, which is minimal during the in -water work period (JulyOctober), will be routed around the dam, into the flum e, and returned to the Little Sandy streambed below the dam.
Because summer time flow in the Little Sandy is so low, no coffer dam will be required at this site.
The dam structure will be removed through a combination of controlled blasting, air hammers, and excavators.
Minimal sediment is stored behind the Little Sandy Dam, and the reach below the dam is considered "sediment starved," so impacts due to sedimentation are expected to be minimal.
No fish passage is currently supplied at the Little Sandy dam, so no temporary passage facility will be constructed during dam removal.
Canals and Flume Between Marmot Dam and the Little Sandy River The water conveyance system from the Sandy to the Little Sandy River consists of a concretelined canal, two int er-connected concrete lined tunnels, another concrete canal, a third tunnel that funnels water into a wooden box flume, and a fourth tunnel that empties into the Little Sandy 11 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
River just upstream from the Little Sandy Dam.
This water conveyance system is approximately 2.8 miles long, and has a 600 cfs capacity.
Approximately 700 feet below the Marmot Dam intake, the canal widens for a sand trap and a set of three vertical rotating screens, which are part of the down-stream migrant fish bypass system to ret urn downstream migrant fish to the main channel.
The fish screen facility includes a bypass flume for use if the screens are plugged with trash or are under repair.
Once Marmot Dam is removed, closure of the canals and tunnels between Marmot and the Little Sandy Dam will be initiated and they will be removed over a period of 8 months without the need for in- water work.
These structures will be removed after the dam, so the canal can be used to divert a portion of the Sandy River flow during deconstruction, helping to manage flow, to assure that the coffer dam will breach at the intended high flow.
Canals and Flume Between the Little Sandy Dam and Roslyn Lake A wooden flume begins at the north abutment of the Little Sandy Diversion Dam, travels 2.8 miles toward Roslyn Lake, and can convey 800 cfs.
The flume crosses the Little Sandy River about 200 feet downstream of the dam, then follows the southern bank of the Little Sandy and Bull Run rivers at a height of 15 to 75 feet above the ground.
It crosses several canyons on timber and steel support structures that are similar to railroad trestles.
The existing wood -box flume was reconstructed in 1948 using pressure -treated lumber supported at 4- feet intervals along its entire length.
A series of additional canals and tunnels carry the water another quarter mile into the southeast arm of Roslyn Lake.
The flume will be dismantled during the same season as the Little Sandy Dam is removed, and Roslyn Lake is emptied and gr aded.
Roslyn Lake Roslyn Lake is an entirely man-made lake, constructed in 1911.
The surface area of Roslyn Lake is 160 acres , with a useable storage capacity of 928 acre- feet, and a gross storage capacity of 2,000 acre- feet.
Approximately 8,000 feet of earth- fill dike sections form the perimeter of the lake.
The highest portions of the dike are 45 feet above the base elevation, the crest of the dike is at a nominal elevation of 657.0 feet mean s ea level, and varies by approximately 6 inches over its length.
A reinforced concrete intake structure is located at the northeast corner of Roslyn Lake.
It includes trash racks, three 10 -foot diameter butterfly type penstock control valves, and air intake pipes and valves for use in filling and draining the penstocks.
The top of the intak e structure is at elevation 662 feet msl.
The buried penstocks are 1,211 feet long, 9 feet in diameter, and made of riveted steel leading to a steel bifurcation structure in the embankment behind the powerhouse.
Each bifurcation in turn supplies individual turbines in the powerhouse.
For project removal, Roslyn Lake will be drained and regraded concurrent with the Little Sandy dam work , during the second year of in- water work.
Draining will occur early in the summer, to allow the lake sediments to dry, and grading and reseeding will occur prior to the fall rainy season.
Bull Run Powerhouse The Project powerhouse is located on the left bank of the Bull Run River.
Four main horizontal hydro turbine- generator units produce an average 110,979 MW H of power.
The tailrace includes a concrete weir, approximately 3 feet high, which extends into the main Bull Run River channel to seal the draft tubes.
Generated power leaves the Project via a single circuit 57 -kV transmission line extending approximately 2.8 mi. west from the Bull Run switchyard to the Bull Run- Dunns Corner substation.
12 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
The powerhouse will be removed between August 2008 and June 2009 using standard demolition techniques, unless a responsible party assumes ownership and liability for the complex.
Fish Passage Facilities in the Project Reach The Sandy River is the home to a number of fish species, including fall Chinook , spring Chinook , steelhead, cutthroat trout, and rainbow trout, as well as lamprey and other species.
Of these, fall Chinook , spring Chinook , and steelhead have been federally listed as a threatened species.
Lower Columbia River coho salmon, including Sandy coho, are listed as "endangered " under the Oregon's state Endangered Species Act (ORS 496.172).
A fish ladder is present at the Marmot Dam to provide upstream passage at this facility.
A downstream bypass is also available for fish at the Marmot location.
The Sandy River supports an active sports fishery, which, due to the listed status of the basin's wild salmonids, must focus on hatchery fish.
However, the threatened status of the wild fish also limits the role of hatchery fish.
NMFS requires that the number of hatchery fish be strictly limited, the genetics of the hatchery fish be closely matched to those that are nat ive to the system ("native broodstock") or that adult hatchery fish be excluded from wild fish sanctuaries.
To accommodate this requirement currently, the Sandy Basin above the Marmot Dam is managed as a wild fish sanctuary.
A fish trap is located in the fish ladder at Marmot Dam. Fish caught in the trap are sorted daily; wild fish are allowed to continue upstream while hatchery origin fish are not .
A temporary trap and haul system will be constructed in the Sandy River below Marmot Dam to provide ups tream fish passage during the activities to deconstruct the dam.
The temporary ladder will not be expected to work once the coffer dam fails, so any barriers to fi sh passage will need to be addressed, once the coffer dams are breached.
The sediments stored behind the dam do not have a cohesive nature, and are not expected to cause fish passage problems as they migrate downstream after dam removal.
However, the Applicant will monitor the reaches of the Sandy River impacted by sediment movement, and will work with the Oregon Department of Fish and Wildlife, the National Marine Fisheries Service, and the U.S, Fish and Wildlife Service to restore fish passage in impacted reaches as necessary.
This monitoring activity is described in the Decommissioning Report (PGE, 2002 ).
Fish passage facilities are currently not available at the Little Sandy Dam, or at Roslyn Lake.
Fish Hatchery Facilities and Fish Management Plans PGE's Bull Run Project includes no fish hatchery facilities.
However, hatchery fish are present in the system, and as noted above, the fish trap at the Marmot Dam is currently used to manage the Sandy Basin split between upstream wild fish and downstream hatchery fish.
This fish sorting activity will cease when the coffer dams are constructed around Marmot Dam, and the temporary trap and haul facility is constructed.
To minimize the impact of hatchery fish on Threat ened and Endangered wild fish, management plans include altering the genetic makeup of and limiting the number of hatchery fish, removing the need for the fish sorting facility at Marmot Dam.
With financial assistance from PGE, fish management plans were recently revised.
Hatchery stock are already being modified so that adults returning in 2007 will be of native Sandy origin (Muck 
Interim Measures Between November, 2004, and Marmot Dam removal in 2007, PGE is proposing to continue operating the project as it has been, with the following additional activities: · The water elevation in the Marmot diversion canal will be restricted to 4.2 feet at night during peak downstream smolt migration, and to 4.7 feet otherwise during the spring smolt migration period.
Due to the canal fish bypass design, lower canal water elevations will improve fish bypass effectiveness and will decrease fish impingement on 13 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
·
·
·
the screens.
More migrants move at night, so the seasonal and daily restriction will leave few migrating fish unprotected.
Channel complexity data in the form of stream depth, will be collected in four reaches that will be most affected by Marmot Dam removal.
Similar data will be collected after dam removal.
Data from before and after will be compared to determine when PGE is no longer responsible for fish barriers in the lower Sandy River after dam removal.
PGE will collect turbidity data for two years prior to dam removal.
Data will be collected from two sites, one above and one below the Project on the Sandy River.
This background data will be used to identify unusual levels in the Sandy River that occur during or after dam removal.
The fish ladder, fish sorting operations and in -stream flows will continue to be operated as they have been until the project facilities are removed.
4.
DEQ EVALUATION OF COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE STANDARDS 4.1 Evaluation of Compliance with State Water Quality Standards 4.1.1 Water Quality Standards of Potential Concern The standards that are of potential concern for this project are listed in Table 1.
The § 401 Application has been evaluated to determine whether the License Amendment and Decommissioning Plan will contribute to water quality violations for the following standards.
The proposed activities do not have the potential to impact other water quality standards.
Table 1.
Water Quality Standards that are of potential concern for the Bull Run License Amendment and Project Removal.
Standard Brief Description Potential Impact Biocriteria Protects aquatic communities from Impact to aquatic communities from cumulative impacts of all potential increased turbidity, sedimentation, impairment potential for release of toxic material associated with sediment Sediment Bottom deposits deleterious to habitat, and Sediment release may alter aquatic life are not allowed.
downstream aquatic habitat and fish passage Temperature Water temperature must be protective of Dam removal may alter flow levels that aquatic communities may in turn affect thermal patterns Toxic Buildup of toxic material that affects aquatic Dam removal in other locations has Material life or human uses are not allowed.
resulted in large impact from toxic laden sediment.
Turbidity Generally not to exceed 10% over High turbidity can impact fish background; limited-duration activities physically, as well as behaviorally permitted in a § 404 or § 401 certificate are allowed, even when increases exceed this level.
4.1.2 Sediment Water Quality Standard The standards that may be affected by sediment movement in the Sandy Basin are listed below:
14 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
ORS 340-0 41 -0485 (2) No wastes shall be discharged and no activities shall be conducted which either alone or in combination with other wastes or activities will cause violation of the following standards in the waters of the Sandy River Basin: (i) The creation of tastes or odors or toxic or other conditions that are deleterious t o fish or other aquatic life, or affect the potability of drinking water or the palatability of fish or shellfish shall not be allowed; (j) The formation of appreciable bottom or sludge deposits or the formation of any organic or inorganic deposits deleterious to fish or other aquatic life or injurious to public health, recreation, or industry shall not be allowed.
Potential Impact of Dam Removal Sediment accumulation is expected to be the biggest impact from releasing the sediment currently stored behind the dams.
Where sediment accumulates in a river depends on the geomorphic conditions of a particular reach, including channel confinement, gradient, and morphology.
Sediment release may affect fish passage by creating physical or velocity barriers in the river channel.
Aquatic habitats might be impacted from sediment accumulation on spawning beds, accumulation in the channel that destroys pools and side channel areas used by fish, and accumulation within the channel that buries habitat for other aquatic life such as aquatic insects and other aquatic species.
Current Water Quality Status The Sandy River system has a relatively high sediment bed load.
The geology of the Sandy basin impac ts sediment transport in the Sandy River, and is described in Stillwater ( 2000a) as follows: Volcanic mudflows originating from Mt. Hood have had an important geomorphic effect on the Sandy River and have traveled as far as the confluences with the Columbia River.
During the most recent (Old Maid episode, 200 years ag o) eruptive period, the Sandy River became choked with sediment over 65 feet deep that completely buried the valley floor between Sandy and Troutdale.
Since then, channels have incised into these deposits, leaving behind several-meter -high terraces with actively eroding banks.
The ongoing influence of past laharic events, Mt. Hood glaciers, and the basin's underlying lithology result in naturally high sediment loading in the Sandy River.
Approximately 980,000 cubic yards of sediment are stored behind Mar mot Dam, most of which will migrate downstream once the Dam has been removed.
The material consists of both spawning sized and larger gravels that may be beneficial, and finer sand particles, that might impact spawning activity and aquatic habitat if they accumulated in the Sandy River channel.
Much less sediment is found behind the Little Sandy Dam; only 4500 cubic yards of material are currently stored behind this dam.
This is a relativ small amount of material, especially ely compared to that stored behind Marmot Dam.
The Little Sandy River is not glacially fed, and the watershed upstream of the dam does not have other perturbations that significantly increase erosion levels.
These characteristics account for the differences in the sediment load of the Sandy and Little Sandy Rivers .
DEQ Evaluation Sediment in the Sandy River The Sandy River below Marmot Dam has been characterized into geomorphic reaches so that the impacts of sediment ation could be better described (Table 2).
These include a steep gorge reach that begins a mile and half below the dam, and two relatively low gradient reaches in the lower river that already store significant percentages of fine material.
In order to predict what the impacts of dam removal might be, a numeric sediment transport model has been developed (Stillwater Sciences, 2000a).
The model predicts how fast sediment will migrate into these reaches, and how much is likely to accumulate in them.
15 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Table 2.
Geomorphic reaches identified and used in the Sediment Reach Upper Lower Reach boundary Boundary Length (River Mile) (River Mile) (miles) 0 32 30 1.6 1 30 28.5 1.5 2 28.5 24.5 4 3 24.5 18.5 6 4 18.5 6 12.5 5 6 0 6
Transport Model Description Reservoir Reach Marmot Dam to Gorge Gorge Gorge to Bull Run River Bull Run Ri ver to Dabney Park Dabney Park to mouth
Results from the sediment transport model for gravel in the Sandy River in the Reservoir and below Marmot Dam are shown in Figure 2.
The model results show that significant gravel deposition is likely to be limited to two Sandy River reaches; Reach 1 directly below the dam, and the upper portion of Reach 3.
Reach 2 is a steep gorge that stores little material, and is expected to pass gravel through fairly quickly.
The model predicts that gravel accumulat ion in the Sandy River below its confluence with the Bull Run River (Reach 4) will be small, and difficult to discern from background levels.
Modeling of sand transport predicts that sand particles released from the dam will travel mostly as suspended load, with accumulation occurring in the lower portion of Reach 5, near the Sandy River mouth.
Fine material accumulation already occurs in this reach, and accumulation is influenced in part by slower water velocities due to Columbia River water backing up the lower Sandy.
The greatest accumulation is likely to occur in the first year after dam removal, although transport of sandy material will continue as long as material stored behind the dam continues to move downstream.
Hydrologic conditions differ from year to year, and will strongly influence sediment movement through the system.
The model was run under various hydrologic conditions, in an effort to understand the potential variation of sediment accumulation.
Under `dry year' conditions, sediment moved more slowly through the system, but caught up to the `normal year' prediction after about 5 years.
The `wet year' scenario had sediment moving more quickly to Reach 3, reducing the accumulation in Reach 1 soon after dam removal (Stillwater Sciences, 2000a).
Spawning habitats in the Sandy Basin have be en identified for the major anadromous salmonids.
Fall Chinook have spawning areas restricted to the Sandy River below Marmot Dam, and few individuals of other species utilize the lower Sandy.
Prefe rred Fall Chinook spawning areas are in Reaches 4 and 5 (from the mouth of the Bull Run River to the mouth of the Sandy) where gravel deposition is expected to be only slightly above background (Figure 2).
However, there is a large amount of sand and other fine material stored behind the dam.
This material is expected to move through the system rapidly, but may accumulate to some degree in the shallow lower reaches where Fall Chinook spawn.
Thus, there is some risk that Fall Chinook Spawning beds would s uffer adverse impacts from sediment release (Stillwater Sciences, 2000b ).
Sediment in the Little Sandy River The lower reach of the Little Sandy is expected to change considerably because dam removal will restore flow that is currently diverted to Roslyn Lake to this reach (Stillwater Sciences, 2000a).
Unlike the Sandy River, vegetation has encroached into the Little Sandy River channel below the dam.
Some vegetation is expected to die when flow is restored to this reach.
Sediment accumulation is not expected to persist in the Little Sandy, due to channel slope and morphology.
Most of the material is expected to accumulate in the Bull Run River below the Little Sandy.
This reach currently has depleted sediment storage due to City of Portland Dams located upstream on the Bull Run River.
These dams are not part of the PGE hydroelectric project, and are not included in this Decommissioning proposal.
16 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
DEQ Findings In order to issue a § 401 Water Quality certificate, the DEQ must find reasonable assurance that the proposed action will not violate water quality standards.
In order to protect water quality, the § 401 Certificate may include conditions that restrict the activity, and thus control the water quality impacts.
The two water quality standards that pertain to sediment impacts are the narrative criteria listed above.
The general test under OAR 340- 041-0485(2)(i) and (j) is whether conditions or deposits will be created that are deleterious to fish or other aquatic life.
No specific numeric threshold defines what conditions or deposits would be deleterious.
Instead, significant or measurable impacts on beneficial uses would demonstrate deleterious impacts.
The beneficial uses that may be impacted by project removal include fish passage, and aquatic habitat, including fish spawning, fish rearing, and habitat for remaining aquatic life.
DEQ evaluated the potential impact to these uses to determine the proposed decommissioning's impacts from release of sediment.
Due to concerns regarding the impacts of sediment release on downstream reaches, fishery biologists and agency geomorphologists reviewed several dam removal alternatives, and determined that risk to both fish habitat and passage would be minimized if the following elements were included in the removal approach: · single season in- water work, · maximizing initial river discharge in order to maximize sediment scour throughout the affected reach, · shaping the reservoir banks to minimize dry season scour, · providing minimum flows downstream of Marmot Dam during removal activities, and · conducting a monitoring program to ensure fish passage ability while sediments stabilize after dam removal.
These are the characteristics of the proposed removal alternative and were agreed to by stakeholders of the Settlement Agreement.
Only Marmot Dam removal is likely to impair fish passage in the Sandy Basin.
Two time periods are critical for passage protection: during the summer and fall of Marmot removal activities ; and the years following dam removal as sediment moves through the basin.
During dam removal, the current downstream passage route through the canal and fish screen, and back to the Sandy River will be maintained.
To maintain upstream passage, PGE will construct and operate a trap and haul facility about a quarter mile downstream of Marmot Dam, that will function from the time coffer dam construction begins until it fails, and water again flows through the Marmot reach.
Once the coffer dam fails, and sediment begins to move, the trap and haul facility providing temporary passage will discontinue working.
After dam removal, blockage of fish passage may be caused by either accumulation of sediment in a reach downstream of the dam, or by head cutting of sediment in the reservoir reac h.
No formal fis h passage structure will be used to provide upstream or downstream fish passage once the coffer dam fails.
Sediment movement is expected to int erfere with the temporary trap and haul structure, and stream conditions are expected to be constantly changing, making the design of any additional temporary passage structure quite difficult.
Instead, PGE will implement a monitoring program to ensure that no reaches pose a significant passage impairment.
Monitoring intensity will vary with the season, occurring more frequently during the spring out -migration season.
Passage impediments that persist for over 2 days during peak migration will cause the Monitoring and Implementation Team to meet and determine what action should be taken to remove the blockage, or to assist migrating fish (i.e. using a temporary trap and haul approach, etc.).
Similar actions will be taken during non- peak passage times, but with less frequency.
Details of the fish passage monitoring are spelled out in the Decommissioning Plan, and the major monitoring steps are included as con ditions in the § 401 certificate.
17 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Figure 2.
Predicted thickness of gravel deposition following removal of Marmot Dam, excerpted from Stillwater Sciences, (2000a, Figure 13a ).
18 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Sediment currently stored in the reservoir reach is expected to migrate with changing flows after the cofferdam is breached.
Other sediment sources, such as riparian and nearby terrestrial sources that are disturbed during demolition can be controlled by using various management practices.
Concrete dust created during demolition may increase stream pH, if released to the stream in high concentrations.
Erosion control management practices are common conditions in § 401 certificates.
However, specific details regarding Project removal activities are not yet identified, as Project removal is not scheduled for three more years.
Th e § 401 certificate includes a condition for the submission of an Erosion Control Plan 120 days in advance of submitting the application for the Section 404 dredge and fill permit.
This plan must describe how PGE will control erosion from project areas during and after project demolition, including management strategies that will minimize the release of concrete dust into Sandy River Basin Because the required Erosion Control Plan was not included in the Public Comment Draft of the § 401 Certificate, the plans required in the future by the § 401 Certificate will also be made available for public comment before they are approved by DEQ.
To determine when sediment movement has slowed down sufficiently that downstream channels have returned to a pre -removal channel character, PGE will conduct channel morphometry monitoring in selected reaches of the Sandy River.
Once this condition is achieved, fish passage blockages due to dam removal are unlikely to occur.
Fish passage monitoring will continue for at least three years after Marmot Dam is removed, and longer if conditions suggest that blockages for fish are still likely.
PGE will no longer be required to mo nitor and maintain fish passage in the Sandy River once the channel monitoring shows that the channel has returned to a pre- project removal character.
The channel morphology measurements and monitoring before and after dam removal will not provide informat ion about the beneficial uses directly, but the information will be necessary to determine when fish passage impairment is no longer a concern.
PGE's responsibility for passage will end when fish passage impairment has a low potential of occurring.
The channel morphometry monitoring is included as a condition in the § 401 certificate because the data collected is essential for determining whether PGE remains responsible for maintaining fish passage.
Fall Chinook are the only species that use the lower mainstem Sandy River (below Marmot Dam) for spawning.
There is a potential that sand will accumulate in the spawning reaches of the lower Sandy during the first rainy season after Marmot Dam is removed.
The Settlement Agreement outlines a Fall Chin ook Salmon Conservation Program.
Activities for this program include the collection of Fall Chinook in the lower Sandy River during the fall of 2007 (the first fall after Marmot Dam is removed) for spawning and rearing in a hatchery .
Tagged smolts will be releas ed into the Sandy the following spring.
Tags will provide the ability to determine the success rate of the rescue effort in returning adults.
In addition to the rescue program, Fall Chinook redds will be monitored to determine the success rate of fry emergence in the lower Sandy that season.
Participation in this program will ensure that Fall Chinook spawning in the lower Sandy River will be protected during the first season after dam removal; thus the most sensitive population will be protected from the adverse effects of sedimentation due to dam removal.
Benthic organisms, those that live in the shallow region of the stream or riverbed, may also be impacted by the sediment transported after dam removal.
Habitat may become inundated with sediment, thus suffocating organisms, or organisms may be displaced as accumulated sediment is suspended and carried further downstream.
The sediment transport model identifies only a few reaches where significant accumulation is expected.
In addition, the reservoir reach itself will undergo rapid changes as sediment is transported out of the reach.
Specific studies or analysis to predict the level of impact on benthic organisms in the Project reaches have not been initiated.
However, material is expected to move relatively quickly through the vario us river reaches (Figure 2).
Thus relatively small reaches will be affected in a given season.
The benthic community structure of these reaches may change as a result of sediment movement and population sizes may decline at times.
However, the Sandy system has a high sediment load (Stillwater, 200b) so the benthic community is likely adapted to sediment movement in this system.
DEQ expects that 19 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
new organisms will continually re -populate these reaches from upstream sites.
Therefore, DEQ has reasonable assurance that the benthic community as a whole will not be impaired by the dam removal activities.
In order to protect the beneficial uses of fish passage and aquatic habitat in the Sandy River, the § 401 Certificate inc ludes conditions that require : · monitoring of fish passage in the Sandy River below Marmot Dam, · monitoring of channel morphology to identify when fish passage impairment from project removal is no longer a concern, · submission of an Erosion Control Plan to address erosion sources and concrete dust during and aft er project facility removal.
Adherence to these conditions is stipulated and agreed upon in the Settlement Agreement and its accompanying Decommissioning Plan.
The § 401 Certificate also includes these activities as conditions.
While some deleterious effect on fish habitat may occur as a result of project removal, these § 401 conditions will minimize the intensity and duration of impacts.
The Sandy River is a high -sediment system, and is known to experience high bedloads as result of natural events.
No quantitative measures of natural bedload are available, so it is difficult to predict and compare the impacts from dam removal to the natural condition of the river.
However, the impacts are not expected to be large, and should be minimized by the project removal approach and monitoring program.
Finally, dam removal is expected to provide long -term benefits to the Sandy system that far outweigh the short term potential impairment of removal.
Thus , based on compliance with the conditions included in the § 401 Certificate, DEQ finds that there is reasonable assurance that the narrative standards applicable under OAR 340-041 -0485(2)(i) and (j) to sediment release from project removal will not be violated.
4.1.3 T urbidity Water Quality Standard Turbidity in water results from inorganic and organic particulate matter being held in suspension.
The standard is designed to minimize the addition of soil particles or any other suspended substances that would cause significant increases in the river's normal, seasonal turbidity pattern.
The applicable standard is: OAR 340-041 -0485(2): No wastes shall be discharged and no activities shall be conducted which either alone or in combination with other was tes or activities will cause violation of the following standards in the waters of the Sandy River Basin: (c) Turbidity (Nephelometric Turbidity Units, NTU): No more than a 10 percent cumulative increase in natural stream turbidities shall be allowed, as measured relative to a control point immediately upstream of the turbidity causing activity.
However, limited duration activities necessary to address an emergency or to accommodate essential dredging, construction or other legitimate activities and whic h cause the standard to be exceeded may be authorized provided all practicable turbidity control techniques have been applied and one of the following has been granted: (A) Emergency Activities: Approval coordinated by DEQ with the Department of Fish and Wildlife under conditions they may prescribe to accommodate response to emergencies or to protect public health and welfare.
Dredging, Construction or other Legitimate Activities: Permit or certification authorized under terms of Sections 401 or 404 (Permits and Licenses, Federal Water Pollution Control Act) or OAR 141- 85- 100 et. seq.
(Removal and Fill Permits, Division of State Lands), with 20 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
(B)
limitations and conditions governing the activity set forth in the permit or certificate.
Potential Impact Upon Project Removal Impacts from tur bidity are generally sublethal, but may accumulate to have an impact on a population.
Turbidity may impact fish by impairing their ability to feed, and by causing them to avoid turbid reaches, leading to migration delays.
Invertebrate community density and diversity may be impacted by high turbidity levels.
These are more likely to occur when turbid events are long term or very frequent in magnitude.
Current Water Quality Status The Sandy River is a glacially fed system, with headwaters located on the flanks of Mount Hood, an 11,240 foot snow -capped mountain.
Few turbidity data exist for this river, and none of these show particularly high values.
However, on occasion, turbidity in the River has been high enough to prompt complaints (Dan Murphy, DEQ, personal communication, Tom DeRoo, USFS, personal communication).
High turbidity events are common in glacially fed streams, due to the large volume of very fine material produced by glacial activity.
DEQ Evaluation Turbidity in the Sandy River No models are available to predict turbidity levels after dam removal.
However, a numeric model for sediment transport was constructed and used to model sediment transport as a result of proposed dam removal alternatives for the Sandy River.
The sediment transport model was used to predict total suspended solids (TSS), a water quality parameter that correlates well with turbidity.
Relationships between turbidity and TSS tend to be site-specific so exact turbidity levels have not been inferred for this system.
However, we expect to see similar trends in both TSS and turbidity, so the model results can be used to predict anticipated turbidity patterns with dam removal.
Model results indicate that TSS will increase during storm events following dam removal, with higher peak concentrations in the first few years following removal, and with lower peak c ontributions through time (Figure 2, Stillwater Sciences, 2000a ).
The model predicts TSS concentrations of about 100 ppm, peaking at 500 ppm during one or two storm events after dam removal, in the reach just below Marmot Dam.
Downstream tributaries will provide dilution water to the high turbidity, so concentrations should also decrease somewhat downstream of the dam site.
Persistent turbidity is generally caused by the suspension of very small particles.
Particle size analysis of material currently found behind the dam indicate that the percentage of very small particles (less than 0.0625 mm) is quite low throughout the layers of sediment found behind the dam.
Schaub et al. (2000) measured zero per cent of this size class in sediments behind the dam.
These sample results suggest that no increas e in turbidity will be observed.
In general, observations of disturbed sediment suggest that this prediction will be incorrect.
However, the low percentage of very fine material suggests that incidences of high turbidity may be lower and for shorter time periods than if measurable fine material was present behind the dam.
Turbidity in this system is expected to occur with high flow events when substantial amounts of material are moved.
Turbidity in the Little Sandy River Very little sediment is stored behind the Little Sandy Dam, and the reach below in both the Little Sandy and Bull Run Rivers are "sediment starved" from years of dam presence; thus, no sediment transport model was constructed for this reach.
With the lack of sediment modeling, there is no prediction for TSS after the Little Sandy Dam is removed.
However, both turbidity and total suspended solids are expected to increase in the Little Sandy and the Bull Run Rivers during 21 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
storm events after the dam is removed.
As below Marmot Dam, these events are expected to be of short duration, and to diminish over time.
Unlike the Sandy River, however, the magnitude of the peaks is expected to be lower than in the Sandy River, and the peak levels are expected to decreas e more quickly after dam removal in the Little Sandy River, due to the much smaller amount of material behind this dam.
Turbidity from Roslyn Lake Roslyn Lake will be drained in early summer.
The lake sediments will be allowed to dry, and the area will be graded using the berm around the lake to fill the lake.
There is a risk of releasing turbid water when the lake is drained, as fine particles have settled in the lake bottom.
Turbidity could also occur in storm runoff from the re-graded site.
DEQ Findings Turbidity During Project Removal Management practices will be used to decrease turbidity generated by dam removal activ ities as long as the coffer dam is in place, and water flow can be controlled in the project area.
Intensive turbidity monitoring will be required above and below the construction sites during the construction period.
Increased turbidity from dam de -cons truction will be managed such that turbidity increases are of limited extent and duration, using flow management and stop- work periods.
Management practices for the project-removal turbidity will be included in a Turbidity Management Plan submitted for DEQ approval.
The § 401 certificate requires submission of the plan no less than 120 days before the §404 Permit Application is filed.
This future date will allow the collection of data on background levels of turbidity in the Sandy River.
In addition, it will allow the Turbidity Management Plan to account for details of the project deconstruction that have not yet been identified.
Because the required Turbidity Management Plan was not included in the Public Comment Draft of the § 401 Certificate, the plans required in the future by this § 401 Certificate will also be made available for public comment before they are approved by DEQ. Turbidity can be high naturally in the Sandy system, especially during low water summer conditions, when glacial melt releas es suspended material downstream.
Thus, in order to understand turbidity in the system, and to understand what current exposure levels aquatic life experience in the Sandy River, the "Decommissioning Plan" (PGE, 2000) directs that two years of turbidity monitoring will occur in the Sandy River prior to dam removal.
This data will be helpful in setting action levels for managing construction to control turbidity.
The rate that water is released from Roslyn Lake will impact how much turbidity is contained in water released through the penstocks.
The Turbidity Management Plan will include management practices for draining Roslyn Lake that will minimize the release of turbid water into the Bull Run River.
Post-Dam Removal After dam removal, turbidity is expected to increase as flows through the reach increase.
There are no known methods that will control this source of turbidity and still allow stored sediments to move within the riverine system.
However, these turbidity episodes are expected to be of relatively short duration, and to diminish through time.
Predictions for elevated total dissolved solids suggest that concentration peaks from storm events will only last a few days; so exposure to increased turbidity is expected to occur for a matter of days at a time, and not over weeks or months.
After dam removal, turbidity in the Sandy River might increase more than 10% over background in the reaches below the Marmot dam.
However, DEQ anticipates that high turbidity levels will be short term in dur ation, and that they may not greatly exceed those that occur naturally in the Sandy system.
These project-removal- related impacts are expected to correlate with high flow, and to subside sufficiently between events so that turbidity related impacts are not constantly present.
22 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
The turbidity standard allows for exceedances of the numeric criterion, if: · the exceedances are due to construction or other legitimate activities, · they will be of limited duration, · all practicable turbi dity control measures will be applied, and · a § 401 certificate, § 404 permit, or state removal- fill permit is issued that outlines the limitations and conditions governing the activity.
This § 401 Certificate includes the following conditions to protect the resource from adve rse turbidity levels: · Turbidity monitoring above Marmot Dam and below the Bull Run confluence with the Sandy River for two years prior to dam removal, · Turbidity monitoring above and below both dam sites during project removal, · Turbidity monitoring above and below both project dams and in the Sandy River below the confluence with the Bull Run River until PGE is excused from responsibility in the basin, · A Turbidity Management Plan that outlines construction management practices during project removal.
· A second opportunity for DEQ review of decommissioning specifications and water quality impacts at the time of PGE's application for a § 404 permit.
Oregon's turbidity standard allows flexibility for short term impacts.
This decommissioning project is expected to improve aquatic conditions, and all practicable measures will be taken to control project related turbidity.
DEQ thus finds that there is reasonable assurance that the Bull Run Project removal activities will not contribute to violations of the turbidity standard set forth in OAR 340 -048- 0485(2)(c).
4.1.4 Biocriteria The biologic criteria standard is intended to complement the other parameter-specific criteria in the following manner.
The parameter-specific criteria are designed to give full protec tion to the most sensitive beneficial use, with the implicit assumption that if the most sensitive beneficial use is protected, then all uses will be protected.
However, the application of these criteria is very limited in considering multiple stressors and cumulative effects.
By contrast, the biological criteria enable the assessment of total impact to the community in situ.
The applicable State standard for Biological Criteria is as follows: OAR 340-041 -0027 Waters of the State shall be of sufficient quality to support aquatic species without detrimental changes in the resident biological communities.
OAR 340-41 -0006 defines several terms used in the Biological Criteria standard: (32) "Aquatic Species" means any plants or animals which live at least part of their life cycle in waters of the State.
(33) "Biological Criteria" are defined as " numerical values or narrative expressions that describe the biological integrity of aquatic communities inhabiting waters of a given designated aquatic life use."
(34) "De signated Beneficial Use" means the purpose or benefit to be derived from a water body, as designated by the Water Resources Department or the [Environmental Quality] Commission.
(35) "Indigenous" means supported in reach of water or known to have been supported according to historical records compiled by State and Federal agencies or published scientific literature.
(36) "Resident Biological Community" means aquatic life expected to exist in a particular habitat when water quality standards for a specific ecoregion, basin or water body are met.
This shall be established by accepted biomonitoring techniques.
23 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
(37) (38)
(39)
"Without detrimental changes in the resident biological community" means "no loss of ecological integrity when compared to natural conditions at an appropria te reference site or region."
"Ecological integrity" is defined as the " the summation of chemical, physical and biological integrity capable of supporting and maintaining a balanced, integrated, adaptive community of organisms having a species compos ition, diversity, and functional organization comparable to that of the natural habitat for the region."
"Appropriate reference site or region" is defined as a "a site on the same water body, or within the same basin or ecoregion that has similar habitat conditions, and represents the water quality and biological community attainable with the areas of concern."
Potential Impact of Dam Removal Sediment transport and turbidity are expected to be high after dam removal.
These are the major anticipated water quality impacts attributable to the project after removal.
For instance, sediment movement might impair fish passage either by creating velocity or channel restrictions, or by intermittent increases in turbidity that hinder upstream fish migration.
Turbidity may also reduce feeding opportunities for fish.
Similarly, macrobenthic organisms in the stream bed may suffer from reduced feeding ability or from habitat flooded with fine material.
Often, sediment transport and turbidity increases are concur rent, so cumulative impacts are possible.
Current Water Quality Status Several potential conditions may currently impair aquatic biota.
These include: · increased temperature caused by decreased flow in the reach below Marmot and Little Sandy Dams, · high flows in the Marmot canal that impair downstream smolt migration, · Sandy River water diverted into the lower Bull Run that confuses upstream fish migrants, · upstream passage delay through the ladder at Marmot Dam instead of fish passing through a natural stream channel.
Some of these impacts have been quantified, such as the existing Project 's contribution to increased temperature (DEQ, 2003), and improved flow levels in the diversion canal (Cramer, 1993;Ward 
Ot hers have a high potential to contribute to impaired use, but specific effects have not been quantified.
Several of these impacts were identified in the scoping process for renewing the FERC license for the project.
With the decision to decommission the project, these impacts will disappear.
Thus there has been no need to describe the impacts in greater detail.
DEQ Evaluation Project removal is expected to remove the current long -standing impacts due to the Project, and will remove any unmeasured impacts that result from multiple project stressors in the future.
Existing temperature impacts due to the project will be reversed as soon as diverted water is returned to the Sandy and Little Sandy Rivers.
Downstream migrants will no longer travel through the Marm ot diversion canal.
The potential for confusing upstream fish migrants by diverting Sandy water to the Bull Run will also cease when diverted flow is returned to the Sandy.
Delays will no longer occur at the Marmot fish ladder.
However, some aspects of fish passage may not improve immediately upon coffer dam breaching as described above (Sediment Section, 4.1.2).
A monitoring and contingency program will be implemented to ensure that stream channels remain open for fish passage.
Turbidity events are not expected to endure, so passage delays due to decreased visibility are expected to be short in duration.
In addition, tributaries of the Sandy should not be impacted by the sediments released after project removal, and can provide refuge during highly tur bid events.
Once the stream channel has stabilized, erosion from banks disturbed by project removal will be controlled.
Finally, as indicated in the "Settlement Agreement " (PGE, 2002 ), with the exception of land in the 24 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
vicinity of Roslyn Lake, all projec t lands will be donated to the Western River Conservancy for long term protection.
DEQ Findings Compared to continued operation, project removal is expected to improve habitat conditions for all aquatic biota in the long term.
Impacts due to sediment and turbidity will be minimized as much as possible by the project removal strategy and post- removal contingency plans , thus minimizing any cumulative effects of dam removal.
In addition, the cumulative impacts of sediment and turbidity are expected to dec line rapidly after the first two wet seasons following dam removal.
Monitoring, erosion control, long-term protection of riparian project lands and vegetative restoration are all included in the "Settlement Agreement " (PGE, 2002).
These combined activities ensure that the Sandy and Little Sandy River reaches impacted by the Project will be restored and protected into the future.
The § 401 Certificate includes conditions that will minimize the impacts from sediment and turbidity.
These measures will also minimize cumulative impacts to biota in the system.
Further, as outlined in the "Settlement Agreement " (PGE, 2002), Project lands not adjacent to Roslyn Lake will be donated to the Western River Conservancy, to help establish conservation corridors in the Sandy Basin.
The establishment of a conservation corridor will help protect future water quality in the Sandy Basin.
The conservation corridor will assist in maintaining site potential vegetation in the riparian zone of the basin rivers, protecting the reaches against elevated temperatures.
In addition, the conservation corridor will help protect aquatic habitat by minimizing erosion into the river, and by providing woody debris to maintain in-stream habitat.
Despite the current impacts present in the Sandy basin, current water quality in the Sandy Basin is generally high.
The system is expected to recover rapidly, with a net decrease in cumulative impacts.
No long -term cumulative impacts are anticipated as a result of Project decommissioning, thus DEQ finds that there is reasonable assurance that the biocriteria standard set forth in OAR 340- 041-0027 will not be violated during and after Project removal.
4.1.5 Temperature Oregon's temperature standard includes several sections of the state water quality rules.
Most are not directly applicable to this § 401 Evaluation.
Pertinent excerpts of the applicable State standards for temperature are as follows : OAR 340 -41 -048 5(2) No wastes shall be discharged and no activities shall be conducted which either alone or in combination with other wastes or activities will cause violation of the following standards in the waters of the Sandy River Basin: (b) Temperature: The changes adopted by the Commission on January 11, 1996, become effective July 1, 1996.
Until that time, the requirements of this rule that were in effect on January 10, 1996, apply.
The method for measuring the numeric temperature criteria specified in this rule is defined in OAR 340- 041-0006(54): (A) To accomplish the goals identified in OAR 340- 041 - 0120(11), unless specifically allowed under a Department-approved surface water temperature management plan as required under OAR 340 -041- 0026(3)(a)(D), no measurable surface water temperature increase resulting from anthropogenic activities is allowed: (i) In a basin for which salmonid fish rearing is a designated beneficial use, and in which surface water temperatures exceed 64.0°F (17.8°C);
25 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
(ii)
In waters and periods of the year determined by the Department to support native salmonid spawning, egg incubation, and fry emergence from the egg and from the gravels in a basin which exceeds 55.0°F (12.8°C); In stream segments containing federally listed Threatened and Endangered species if the increase would impair the biological integrity of the Threatened and Endangered population;
(iii)
OAR 340 -041 -0026(3)(a)(D) [I]n any waterbody identified by the Department as exceeding the relevant numeric temperature criteria... and designated as water quality limited under Section 303(d) of the Clean Water Act, the followin g requirements shall apply to appropriate watersheds or stream segments...: (i) Anthropogenic sources are required to develop and implement a surface water temperature management plan which describes the best management practices, measures, and/or control technologies which will be used to reverse the warming trend of the basin, watershed, or stream segment identified as water quality limited for temperature;
OAR 340 -041 -0120(11) EQC policy on surface water temperature (as regulated in the basin standards found in ..., OAR- 340 -041- 0565, ... ) : (a) It is the policy of the Environmental Quality Commission (EQC) to protect aquatic ecosystems from adverse surface water warming caused by anthropogenic activities.
The intent of the EQC is to minimize the risk to cold -water aquatic ecosystems from anthropogenic warming of surface waters, to encourage the restoration of critical aquatic habitat, to reverse surface water warming trends, to cool the waters of the State, and to control extremes in temperature fluctuations due to anthropogenic activities: (A) The first element of this policy is to encourage the proactive development and implementation of best management practices or other measures and available temperature control technologies for nonpoint and point source activities to prevent thermal pollution of surface waters; The second element of this policy is to require the development and implementation of surface water temperature management plans for those basins exceeding the numeric temperature criteria identified in the basin standards.
The surface water temperature management plans will identify the best management practices (BMPs) or measures and approaches to be taken by nonpoint sources, and technologies to be implemented by point sources to limit or eliminate adverse anthropogenic warming of surface waters.
(B)
OAR 340-41 -0006 defines several terms used in the Temperature Standards: (54) "Numeric Temperature Criteria" are measured as the seven-day moving average of the daily maximum temperatures.
If there is insufficient data to establish a seven-day average of maximum temperatures, the numeric criteria shall be applied as an instantaneous maximum.
The measurements shall be made using a sampling protocol appropriate to indicate impact to the beneficial uses ; (55) "Measurable Temperature Increase" means an increase in stream temperature of more than 0.25°F; (56) "Anthropogenic", when used to describe "sources" or "warming", means that wh ich results from human activity.
26 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Potential Impact of Project Removal Hydroelectric projects do not commonly release heated water into receiving waters.
Ho wever, hydro projects may cause water heating by diverting water away from project reaches , in this case below Marmot and Little Sandy Dams.
Decreas ing water quantity in these reaches can lead to increases in water temperature.
In addition, water storage in Roslyn Lake might also pro vide an opportunity for warming.
Project decommissioning will eliminate water diversions and storage in Roslyn Lake, and thus remove the potential for heating in the Project reaches.
Current Water Quality Status Both the lower Sandy River (from the mout h to Marmot Dam) and the lower Bull Run River (from its mouth to the City of Portland Bull Run Dam #2) were designated as water quality limited for temperature on the 1998 "303(d)" list.
Temperature data collected in the Sandy Basin indicated that summer time temperatures exceed the state standards (DEQ, 2003 ).
The Draft TMDL used a model to predict system potential temperatures in the Sandy Basin.
This identifie d that heating occurs in the diverted reach of the Sandy River below Marmot Dam.
DEQ Evaluation The model used to evaluate temperature data collected in the Sandy Basin, was also used to predict what the temperature in the Sandy River would be if Marmot Dam was removed.
The results showed that the Sandy River water temperature between Marmot Dam and the Bull Run River would drop significantly if diverted water was restored to the Sandy River (Figure 3).
DEQ Finding The draft TMDL analyses showed that diversions at Marmot Dam contribute to increases in temperature in the Sandy River, between Marmot Dam and the mouth of the Bull Run River.
The draft TMDL has not been submitted to EPA for approval, so it is not in effect at this time.
However, the analytical results indicate that the Bull Run Project contributes to warmer river temperature by diverting water from the Sandy River.
When an activity increases temperature in a waterbody that is included on Oregon's List of Water Quality Limited Waters , a Temperature Management Plan is required.
Water quality certificates have included Temperature Management Plans for other FERC projec ts (Pacificorp's North Umpqua Project, and PGE's Pelton Rounde Butte Project).
In this case, project decommissioning will remove any thermal contributions to the Sandy Basin, so the § 401 Certificate serves as the Temperature Management Plan for the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project.
The § 401 Certificate also includes a condition reserving DEQ's right to reconsider the certification in the event removal of the Marmot and Little Sandy Dams is not completed by December 31, 2009.
Dam removal and the return of divert ed water to the Sandy River will eliminate the current Project impact on temperature below Marmot Dam.
Subsequent conversion of PGE's water right for the Sandy diversion to an in -stream water right, in accordance with ORS 543A.305 as required under the Settlement Agreement will secure the improvement in water temperature, and provides further assurance to DEQ's finding that dam removal activities will not contribute to violations of the water quality standard for temperature.
27 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
FLIR Data - 3:11 to 4:24 PM
4:00 PM Site Potential
Site Potential Temp NO MARMOT
Marmot Dam RM 30.4
Cedar Cr RM 21.4
Salmon R. RM 37.3
26 24
20 18 16
14 12 10 8 6
48
46
44
42
40
38
36
34
32
30
28
26
24
22
20
18
16
14
12
10
8
6
4
2
0
River Mile
Figure 3.
Water Temperature in the Sandy River under Current Condition (from Forward Looking Infrared Radiometry, FLIR) and modeled Site potential With and Without Marmot Dam.
From the Draft Sandy Basin TMDL, (DEQ 2003).
28 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Stream Temperature (C)
Clear Cr RM 43.5 Zigzag R. RM 42.8
22
Alder Cr RM 33.4
Lost Creek RM 46.5
4.1.6 Toxic Substances This standard provides protection for humans, wildlife, and aquatic life from adverse effects resulting from the presence of toxic substances above natural levels, either alone or in combination with other chemicals or substances.
Where needed, DEQ can consider additional studies reported in the scientific literature to review applicability of numeric criteria, or to set guidance values.
Bioassays can be used to determine effects of site-specific effluents or chemical substances on aquatic life.
The applicable standard is: OAR 340-41 -0485(2): No wastes shall be discharged and no activities shall be conducted which either alone or in combination with other wastes or activities will cause violation of the following standards in the waters of the Sandy River Basin: (p)Toxic Substances: (A)Toxic substances shall not be introduced above natural background levels in the waters o f the state in amounts, concentrations, or combinations which may be harmful, may chemically change to harmful forms in the environment, or may accumulate in sediments or bioaccumulate in aquatic life or wildlife to levels that adversely affect public health, safety, or welfare; aquatic life; wildlife; or other designated beneficial uses; (B) Levels of toxic substances shall not exceed the criteria listed in Table 20 which were based on criteria established by EPA and published in Quality Criteria for Water (1986), unless otherwise noted: (C) The criteria in paragraph (B) of this subsection shall apply unless data from scientifically valid studies demonstrate that the most sensitive designated beneficial uses will not be adversely affected by exceeding a criterion or that a more restrictive criterion is warranted to protect beneficial uses, as accepted by the Department on a site specific basis.
Where no published EPA criteria exist for a toxic substance, public heath advisories and other published scientific literature may be considered and used, if appropriate, to set guidance values; (D) Bioassessment studies such as laboratory bioassays or in stream measurements of indigenous biological communities, shall be conducted, as the Department deems necessary, t o monitor the toxicity of complex effluents, other suspected discharges or chemical substances without numeric criteria, to aquatic life.
These studies, properly conducted in accordance with standard testing procedures, may be considered as scientifically valid data for the purposes of paragraph C of this subsection.
If toxicity occurs, the Department shall evaluate and implement measures necessary to reduce toxicity on a case-by -case basis.
Potential impact upon Project removal A large amount of material is stored behind Marmot dam.
Any dam removal options would include displacing a large volume of sediment.
Options for dealing with the stored sediment , including both landfill and in- water sites, depend on whether toxic material was associated with the sediment.
High toxic levels would preclude the sediment from being released downstream, and may influence what sort of site could be used for upland disposal.
Current water quality status The Army Corps of Engineers' Dredged Materi al Evaluation Framework (ACOE, 1998), describes a process for determining the size fraction of material present, and provides guidance values that indicate when sediment should be considered toxic.
Sediment that complies with the toxic screening criteria may be considered for in-stream disposal.
The Army Corps Guidance is not rule, but it does provide guidelines for assessing the level of toxic material associated with sedimentary material.
While the dam removal options identified in the Settlement Agreement do not include dredging per se, sediment from behind Marmot and Little Sandy Dams is expected to migrate downstream to other riverine locations.
As such, dam removal activities will mimic in-s tream disposal of dredged material.
The ACOE guidance outlines a tiered approach for assessing suitable locations for dredge spoils.
The first step of the tiered approach includes an assessment of the particle size of the material that will be dredged.
PGE funded an analysis to characterize the sediments stored behind Marmot Dam.
These are reported in Schaub, et al. (2000), who indicate that the particle size of material behind Marmot Dam varies within horizontal sediment units, and ranges from 0 to 15% fine material (silt and clay).
Percent sand ranges from 15 to 85% by weight, dominating Unit 2, a subsurface layer between 10 and 35 feet thick, located 7 to 15 feet below the current ground surface.
Material behind Little Sandy Dam contains up to 7% fines, and 45% sand.
29 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Fine material behind both Marmot and Little Sandy Dams we re then analyzed for chemical parameters as outlined in the Army Corps of Engineers (1998) guidance.
DEQ Evaluation Results for toxic constituents in sediment behind Marmot and Little Sandy Dams showed that many of the analytes were below detection limits, and that measurable analytes were well below the corresponding screening value for samples from both Marmot and Little Sandy sediments.
Tables 3 and 4 show the measurable concentrations of analytes found in sediments behind Marmot and Little Sandy Dams respectively, along with the applicable screenin g criteria.
These results are taken directly from Schaub, et al. (2000).
Table 3.
Comparison of the analytical results for Marmot Dam sediment to guideline levels.
Additional analytes were tested for; only those with results greater than detection limit are shown here.
(Schaub, et al. 2000).
Chemical Analyte Maximum Detected Concentration ACOE Screening Level Arsenic 0.85 mg/Kg 57 mg/Kg Chromium 19.8 mg/Kg Not listed Copper 20.9 mg/Kg 390 mg/Kg Lead 1.88 mg/Kg 450 mg/Kg Nickel 9.9 mg/Kg 140 mg/Kg Zinc 31.0 mg/Kg 410 mg/Kg Table 4.
Comparison of analytical results for Little Sandy Dam sediment to guideline levels.
Only Little Sandy analytes with concentrations greater than the detection limit are shown in the Table.
(Schaub, et al., 2000) Chemical Analyte Maximum Detected ACOE Screening Level Concentration Antimony 0.2 mg/Kg 150 mg/Kg Arsenic 3.7 mg/Kg 57 mg/Kg Chromium 40.1 mg/Kg Not listed Copper 26.5 mg/Kg 390 mg/Kg Lead 2.6 mg/Kg 450 mg/Kg Nickel 55.1 mg/Kg 140 mg/Kg Selenium 0.7 mg/Kg Not listed Silver 0.4 mg/Kg 6.1 mg/Kg Zinc 46.8 mg/Kg 410 mg/Kg PCB's (undifferentiated) 0.2 mg/Kg 130 mg/Kg Phenanthrene 0.014 mg/Kg 1.5 mg/Kg Fluoranthene 0.028 mg/Kg 1.7 mg/Kg Pyrene 0.018 mg/Kg 2.6 mg/Kg Chrysene 0.008 mg/Kg 1.4 mg/Kg Benzo(b)fluoranthene 0.007 mg/Kg 3.2 mg/Kg
DEQ Findings Results from the analyses for toxic materials show that any meas urable results were well below the screening values used to evaluate suitability of dredge spoils by the Army Corps (2000).
Based on these results, DEQ finds that there is reasonable assurance that downstream release of sediments currently found behind Marmot and Little Sandy Dams will not result in a discharge of toxic material in violation of OAR 340 -041- 0485(2)(p).
Due to the high quality of the material found behind the dams, no conditions related to toxic material are included in the § 401 Cert i ficate.
30 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
4.2 Evaluation of Compliance with Sections 301, 302, 303, 306,and 307 of the Federal Clean Water Act In order to certify a project pursuant to § 401 of the federal Clean Water Act, the Department must find that the project complies with applicable provisions of Sections 301, 302, 303, 306, and 307 of the Act and state regulations adopted to implement these sections.
Sections 301, 302, 306, and 307 of the federal Clean Water Act deal with effluent limitations, water quality related effluent limitations, national standards of performance for new sources, and toxic and pretreatment standards.
DEQ finds that none of these sections are applicable to the proposed decommissioning of the Bull Run Project.
Section 303 of the Act relates to Water Quality Standards and Implementation Plans.
The federal Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has adopt ed regulations to implement Section 303 of the Act.
The EQC has adopted water quality standards consistent with the requirements of Section 303 and the applicable EPA rules.
The EQC standards are codified in Oregon Administrative Rules Chapter 340, Division 41.
The Environmental Protection Agency has approved the Oregon standards pursuant to the requirements of Section 303 of the Act.
Therefore, the applicant's Project must comply with Oregon Water Quality Standards to qualify for certification.
As discussed above in this report, the proposed decommissioning will comply with Oregon Water Quality Standards, and therefore Section 303 of the Clean Water Act, provided the conditions to the § 401 Certification are satisfied.
4.3 Evaluation of Other Appropria te Requirements of State Law Once a Project is determined to qualify for § 401 certification, additional determinations may be made to identify additional conditions that are appropriate in a certificat ion to assure compliance with other appropriate requirements of state law, pursuant to § 401(d) of the Clean Water Act .
Such requirements are "appropriate" if they have any relation to water quality, Arnold Irrigation Dist. v. DEQ, 79 Or.App.
136 (1986), and may include requirements as to water quantity if necessary to protect a beneficial use.
PUD No.1 of Jefferson Co. v. Washington Dept. of Ecology, 511 U.S. 700 (1994).
4.3.1 Division of State Lands ORS 196.810 requires that permits be obtained from the Oregon Division of State Lands (DSL) prior to any fill and removal of material from the bed or banks of any stream.
Such permits, when issued, may be expected to contain conditions to assure protection of water quality so as to protect fish and aquatic habitat.
The proposed decommissioning activity will require a removal -fill permit from DSL, which is administratively coordinated with issuance of a dredge and fill permit by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers under § 404 of the Clean Water Act.
The § 401 Certificate will include a condition requiring PGE to obtain a removal -fill permit from DSL, and a condition providing DEQ the opportunity to review decommissioning specifications and any new information at the time of application for a § 404 permit to determine whether the proposed certification is sufficient or if a new § 401 application is required.
4.3.2 Department of Fish and Wildlife Oregon statute requires that fish passage be maintained in waters that support native migratory fish.
ORS 509.585.
Fish passage in the Sandy River is currently provided by the ladder at Marmot Dam.
During Marmot Decommissioning, upstream passage through the fish ladder will no longer be possible.
PGE has agreed to construct a temporary trap and haul facility to provide fish upstream passage around Marmot Dam.
Maintaining fish passage at this site will support the designated beneficial use for fish passage in this basin.
Construction of the temporary trap and haul facility has been included as a condition in the § 401 Certificat e.
In addition to the Surrender Application, PGE is requesting a License Amendment that will allow project operation to continue until the Project is decommissioned.
In order to better protect 31 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
downstream fish migrants, beginning in 2005, and continuing until the Project is decommissioned, PGE will modify its operation of the Marmot Canal during spring fish runs.
Downstream fish migration occurs with fish entering the diversion canal at Marmot Dam, and exiting the canal through ports into the fish bypass structure that returns downstream migrants to the Sandy River below Marmot Dam.
Port s in this system are more accessible to fish when the canal elevation is no higher than 4.2 feet.
In order to protect downstream migration, the canal level will be limited to 4.7 feet during spring out migration, with an additional limitation of 4.2 feet at night during the peak migration period.
In accordance with ORS 509.615 (passage) and 509.615 (bypass) this operating procedure has been added as a condition to the § 401 certificate.
This state statute also supports the beneficial use of fish passage at this site.
Sediment release from Marmot Dam may result in burial of Fall Chinook redds, especially during the first wet season after the dam has been removed.
PGE will participate in a Fall Chinook Conservat ion effort.
This effort will be lead by ODFW, and will occur during the 2007 -2008 spawning period; the first winter season after Marmot dam is removed.
This effort will include collecting Chinook and raising offspring in a hatchery for later rele ase back into the Sandy River, and monitoring redd success over the 2007- 2008 season.
These two activities will ensure some success for the 2007 -2008 year class of Fall Chinook.
In addition, it will provide valuable information about the impact of sediment movem ent on spawning habitat .
4.3.3 Department of Land Conservation and Development ORS Chapter 197 contains provisions of state law requiring the development and acknowledgement of comprehensive land use plans.
This chapter also requires state agency actions to be consistent with acknowledged local land use plans and implementing ordinances.
The § 401 Application for the Bull Run included an approved Land Use form from the Clackamas County Planning office.
The project decommissioning activities do not include land use changes that are likely to impair water quality.
In contrast, the donation of project riparian lands and restoration plans for impacted reaches are likely to maintain or improve existing riparian conditions.
No § 401 certification condition is necessary in relation to ORS Chapter 197.
4.3.4 Department of Environmental Quality On-site disposal of sewage is governed by ORS 454.705 et. seq. and OAR Chapter 340, Divisions 71 and 73.
The purpose of these rules is to prevent health hazards and protect the quality of surface water and groundwater.
Onsite systems are present at the Project facilities, are in compliance with Oregon rules , and do not discharge to surface waters .
No § 401 certification condition is necessary in relation to ORS 454.705 et seq. ORS 466.605 et. seq. and ORS 468.780- 815 establish requirements for reporting and cleanup of spills of petroleum products and hazardous materials.
ORS 468.742 requires submittal of plans and specifications for water pollution control facilities to DEQ for review and approval prior to construction.
One of the purposes of these statutes, and rules promulgated pursuant thereto, is to prevent contamination of surface or groundwater.
PGE maintains spill prevention control and countermeasure plans, at their project facilities, and is already in compliance with this rule.
However, as a formality, a condition requiring a Spill Prevention, Control and Countermeasure Plan has been included in the § 401 Certificate.
4.3.5 Department of Water Resources Oregon statute 543A .305 directs Project water rights to be converted to in-stream use upon decommissioning.
The water right for power gen eration at this project consists of an un -adjudicated water claim.
In addition, the amount of water diverted from the Sandy at Marmot depends upon the amount of water available in the Little Sandy.
Details for the treatment of this complex water right were determined and included in the Settlement Agreement.
Converting the water right to a protected in-stream water right will help ensure that water temperature will meet the site potential target in the project affected reach.
32 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
5.0 PUBLIC COMMENT 5.1 Issuance of Public Notice, Opportunity to Comment Public Notice of the Bull Run Project § 401 Application and proposed § 401 certification documents was distributed September 2, 2003.
DEQ distributed this notice to the Agency's mailing list of 550, including known interested persons and agencies, to adjacent landowners, and to the FERC mailing list for the Bull Run Project.
A Public Hearing was held on September 25, 2003, at 3:00 p.m. at DEQ's Northwest Regional Office, in Portland, Oregon.
An opportunity for informal questions was offered first, followed by a formal period of either oral or written comment.
Two people attended the meeting, and neither submitted formal comment.
5.2 Summary of Public Comment Received Written comments were received from three parties; the U.S, Fish and Wildlife Service, Don Mench and Christy Slovacek, and the Northwest Environment al Defense Center.
The comments are included in Appendix A of this document, and are summarized in Table 5 along with DEQ's response.
Table 5.
A summary of public comment received on the draft § 401 and related documents, and DEQ's response to those comments.
Author Comment Response U. S. Fish and Reported incidences of increased ODEQ concurs with the Draft Biological Wildlife Service pH from release of concrete dust Opinion that any excursions of high pH that at other dam removal sites do occur are likely to be short lived, and quickly diluted in the system.
ODEQ generally includes conditions regarding concrete dust containment in other § 401 Certificates.
The Evaluation and Findings Report has been revised to require that this issue be addressed in the Erosion Control Plan.
Don Mench and General Support for the Dam ODEQ appreciates the comment and Christy Slovacek Decommissioning, and support.
No revisions of the § 401 Certificate identification of additional benefits or Evaluation and Findings Report were from project removal made.
Northwest NEDC provided broad support for ODEQ appreciates support; no document Environmental Project removal.
revisions were made.
Defense Center (NEDC) Northwest NEDC desires an opportunity to As these plans relate to a future action Environmental review the Erosion Control and whose details have still to be identified, no Defense Center Turbidity Management Plans draft plans were available for public review in (NEDC) required as § 401 Conditions.
the recent public comment process.
They will be made available for a 30 day public comment period prior to DEQ approval.
The Evaluation and Findings Report and the § 401 Certificate have been revised to reflect the future public comment period, and to increase the lead time for plan review to accommodate comment.
Northwest NEDC requested clarification on The § 401 Certificate and the Evaluation and Environmental the number of turbidity monitoring Findings Report were revised to clarify the Defense Center sites required in the vicinity of the need for turbidity monitoring stations above 33 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
(NEDC) Northwest Environmental Defense Center (NEDC)
Little Sandy Dam. NED C requested that DEQ require a Temperat ure Management Plan (TMP) to address the Project's contribution to high stream temperatures below Marmot Dam between now and dam removal.
NED C requested that DEQ require a Dissolved Oxygen Management Plan to address the Project's contribution to impaired dissolved oxygen concentrations in the lower Sandy River.
and below the Little Sandy Dam during and after dam removal activities.
DEQ considers this § 401 Certificate as the TMP for this project.
The Evaluation and Findings Re port has been revised to recognize the stat us of the § 401 Certificate as the Project Temperature Management Plan.
DEQ has collected additional data for intergravel dissolved oxygen in the lower river.
These data show that dissolved oxygen concentrations are not being violated in the lower River, so DEQ is proposing that the listing for dissolved oxygen violations in the Sandy River be removed in the 2004 303(d) list.
Should dissolved oxygen limitations occur on the list at a future date, a management plan will be required for any future TMDL allocation.
Northwest Environmental Defense Center (NEDC)
6.
CONCLUSIONS AND RECOMMENDATION FOR CERTIFICATION The Department has evaluated the applicant's Project proposal and determines that it will comply with the applicable provisions of Sections 301, 302, 303, 306, and 307 of the Clean Water Act, Oregon Administrative Rules, Chapter 340, Division 41, and other appropriate requirements of state law.
Based on the preceding analysis and findings, it is recommended that, pursuant to § 401 of the Federal Clean Water Act and ORS 468B.040, the Director approve the application for certification of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project Amendment and Decommissioning Order, as indicated in the attac hed § 401 c ertification with conditions .
34 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
7.
REFERENCES Army Corps of Engineers, 1998.
Dredged Material Evaluation Framework, Lower Columbia River Management Area.
Army Corps of Engineers, Northwestern Division, Portland, OR and Seattle, WA. Cramer, D.P. 1993.
Evaluation of the Marmot Canal Downstream Migrant Bypass System, Final Report.
Bull Run Project, FERC License #477, Portland General Electric Company.
DeRoo, Tom.
April, 2002.
Personal Communication, Mt Hood National Forest, Sandy, Oregon.
DEQ, 2003.
Sandy River Basin Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL).
Discussion Draft, April 2003.
Oregon Department of Environme ntal Quality, Portland, OR. Leader, K.A. 
Evaluation of the Marmot Canal Downstream Migrant Bypass System, 1999.
Oregon Department of Fish 
Sandy River Basin Management Plan Amendment 2001.
Oregon Department of Fish and Wildlife, Clackamas, Oregon.
Murphy, Dan.
June, 2002.
Personal Communication, Complaints Section, DEQ, Portland, Oregon.
Portland General Electric Company, 2002.
Settlement Agreement Concerning Removal of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project FERC Project 477.
.
Schaub, M.F., King, D.E., and Myers, B.K. 2000.
Sandy River Sediment Study Bull Run Hydroelectric Project (FERC Project number 477).
Completed by Squier Associates, Lake Oswego, OR for PGE, February , 2000.
Stillwater Sciences, 2000a.
Numerical Modeling of Sediment Transport in the Sandy River, OR, Following Removal of Marmot Dam.
Supplement to Environmental Assessment for the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project, FERC Project number 477.
Technical Report for PGE. Stillwater Sciences, 2000b.
Evaluation of Geomorphic Effects of Removal of Marmot and Little Sandy Dams and Potential Impacts on Anadromous Salmonids .
Technical Report for PGE.
Ward, D.L. 
Evaluation of the Marmot Canal Downstream Migrant Bypass System, 1998.
Oregon Department of Fish 
35 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
APPENDIX A: Public comment received on draft § 401 Certificate and Evaluations and Findings Report.
1.
Comment from the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service:
36 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
37 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
2.
Comment from Don Mench and Christy Slovacek: To: Avis Newell DEQ, NW Region Water Quality Division th 2020 SW 4 Ave.
Suite 400 Portland, OR 97204 Newell.avis@deq.state.or.us From: Don Mench 
We have participated in public meetings and reviewed numerous documents during this lengthy process and support the established timeline and decommissioning process that has been agreed upon by the participants.
We recognize the challenges involved with the removal of the hydro project and believe the engineering and construction skills exist to facilitate the decommissioning successfully.
During our years of living along the Sandy River, we have witnessed significant sediment flows through the river system at various times.
We therefore believe that, subsequent to the removal of Marmot Dam, dispersal of the sediments behind the dam could occur in a manner similar to a natural event (i.e. the 2000 sediment flow which significantly exceeded the volume of sediments currently behind the dam).
We also support these additional reasons for removal: v Low streamflow levels between Marmot Dam and Bull Run River, which ad versely affect wild fish migration and habitat.
v Water temperature increases due to the hydro system v Past flume failures v Tunnel cave-ins between Marmot Dam 
Sincerely, Don Mench 
3.
Comment from Northwest Environmental Defense Center:
NORTHWEST E NVIRONMENTAL DEFENSE C ENTER 10015 S.W. Terwilliger Blvd., Portland, Oregon 97219 Phone: (503) 768 -6673 Fax: (503) 768 -6671 www.nedc.org
October 1, 2003 Avis Newell Oregon DEQ, Northwest Region 2020 S.W. Fourth Avenue, Suite 400 Portland, OR 97201 RE: Comments on the Application for Certification Pursuant to Section 401 of the Federal Clean Water Act for the Decommissioning of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project on the Sandy River in Clackamas County, Oregon (FERC No. 477) Dear Mr. Newell, Please accept these comments from the Northwest Environmental Defense Center (NEDC) on the application for certification pursuant to section 401 of the federal clean water act, submitted by Portland General Electric Company (PGE) for the Decommissioning of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project on the Sandy River in Clackamas County, Oregon (FERC No. 477).
The NEDC rep resents a diverse membership with concerns about the health of Oregon's water bodies and a passion for the remaining wild rivers of the Pacific Northwest.
PGE and the other 22 members of the Decommissioning Work Group are to be commended for their efforts thus far in piecing together a responsible plan for the removal of the Marmot and Little Sandy dams, taking a significant step towards returning the basin to health and paving the way to long term protection under the ownership of the Western River Conser vancy.
We would never the less like to take this opportunity to raise a few questions and concerns about the proposed clean water act § 401 certification.
The Oregon Department of Environmental Quality's (DEQ) draft § 401 permit for the decommissioning of the Bull Run Hydroelectric Project has been divided into five broad certificate conditions, following the identified water quality standards of potential concern, and the following comments will adhere to this format with the addition of a section addres sing concerns that have not been discussed in the draft Evaluation and Findings Report or addressed by the draft permit.
Certification Conditions: 1) Sediment We agree with the findings of the DEQ in the draft Evaluation and Findings Report, that some impacts from unleashing the large volume of sediment behind Marmot dam are to be expected, but that the long -term benefits of dam removal out weigh short -term impacts from accumulation.
We would ask for an opportunity to comment on the Erosion Control Plan required under the terms of the draft § 401 permit prior to its approval by DEQ. 2) Turbidity Without existing turbidity data for the affected waterbodies, determining permitted levels within the applicable standard of "no more than a 10 percent cumulat ive increase" proves difficult.
For this reason, we support the proposed approach, including monitoring before, during, and after dam removal.
Some of the monitoring details are discussed in the Decommissioning Plan and Draft 39 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
Evaluation and Findings Report, but the language of the draft permit itself only implies some of the detail.
We hereby request the following clarifications: Questions 1: The draft Evaluation and Findings Report specifies that during project removal turbidity monitoring will be conducted above and below the dam sites.
Draft Evaluation and Findings Report, FERC No. 477 at 21 (OR DEQ Aug. 26, 2003).
The use of the plural "sites" indicates that the DEQ intended there to be two monitoring sites (above and below) at both the Marmot and Little Sandy Dam.
Language in the permit itself, however, only requires a single monitoring site at the Little Sandy Dam, with no further direction as to whether this should be above or below the dam ("During Project Removal: PGE shall monitor sites dire ctly above and below Marmot Dam, at Little Sandy Dam, and at Roslyn Lake").
Id.
At 2.
In light of the direction in the Evaluation and Findings Report, why does the permit only require a single monitoring site at the Little Sandy Dam? Question 2: The draft permit requires monitoring at five sites after project removal, and lists them as "above and below Marmot Dam, at the Little Sandy Dam, and in the Sandy River below the mouth of the Bull Run River."
Id.
At 2.
It is implied here that the DEQ intends there to be monitoring above and below the Little Sandy Dam, and the language of the draft Evaluation and Findings Report supports this interpretation.
Id.
At 21.
Did the DEQ intend to include language requiring monitoring "above and below" the Little Sa ndy Dam in the permit? We would also ask for the opportunity to comment on the Turbidity Management Plan required under the terms of the draft § 401 permit prior to its approval by DEQ. 3) Biological Criteria Impacts on fish populations will be potentially impacted by both sediment accumulations and turbidity as noted in the draft Evaluation and Findings Report.
We support plans developed to address these potential impacts as detailed in Section 3 of the Decommissioning Plan.
We do have concerns about current conditions with respect to impacts from temperature and DO, as discussed below.
4) Temperature Both the Sandy and Bull Run rivers are listed by the DEQ as salmon spawning grounds.
Numerous studies and reports clearly support that even at temperatures below 20 degrees C salmonids will be adversely affected due to increased disease, increased mortality, decreased growth and decreased reproductive success.
An EPA sponsored study recently reviewed a wide body of existing scientific information relat ing to the effects of temperatures on salmonids, and provides a very compelling picture that the overwhelming body of scientific information does not support that salmonids will be protected at 20 degrees C. Dale A. McCullough, PhD. February 22, 1999 EPA 910- R -99 -010.
In fact, the report concluded that the existing body of scientific studies have found that temperatures greater than 15.5 degrees C greatly enhance incidence of disease and increased mortality rates.
Both the Sandy and Bull Run rivers are currently listed under 303(d) for exceeding temperature criteria.
According to Oregon law, DEQ is required to develop and implement a surface water temperature management plan.
OAR 340 -041 -0026(3)(a)(D).
However, the 401 certification makes no reference to the "water quality limited" listing of rivers in the project, and makes no requirements for PGE to monitor or alleviate heating caused by the project during its final years of operation.
We recognize that removal of the dams is the ultimate final solut ion for mitigating impacts to temperature caused by the Marmot and Little Sandy dams, but also recognize that deconstruction projects of this scale and complexity can easily run over schedule.
The draft permit reserves for the DEQ the right to modify the certificate conditions as necessary to ensure implementation of TMDLs if the dams are not removed by December 31, 2009, but otherwise releases PGE from the necessity of addressing excess temperatures.
We find this unacceptable and believe that the future decommissioning of the dams does not relieve the current duty of the 40 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
DEQ to require a temperature management plan under OAR 340-041 -0026(3)(a)(D).
Given the existing limitations that require that dam decommissioning commence no earlier than 2007, and the reality that the schedule could easily be pushed back even further, we see it as prudent to start addressing existing TMDL exceedences sooner rather than later.
5) General We have no comments on the general requirements of the draft §401 permit.
Additi onal Concerns Closely related to the temperature concerns discussed above is that the Sandy River has been water quality limited for dissolved oxygen (DO) on the 2002 "303(d)" list.
Question 3: Has the DEQ investigated how the Marmot Dam impacts the DO concentrations in the Sandy River? As with temperature, we recognize that removal of the dams will ultimately mitigate any impacts that the Marmot Dam is having on the Sandy River and fish populations.
In the interim, we request that DEQ require a DO management plan that will address the TMDL exceedences in the coming years prior to dam decommissioning.
Conclusion Thank you for reviewing this comment to the proposed PGE Bull Run Hydroelectric Project Decommissioning.
Sincerely, M. Scott Broadwell Matthew L. Merrill
Comments submitted on behalf of: The Northwest Environmental Defense Center 10015 SW Terwilliger Blvd.
Portland, OR 97219
41 Evaluation and Findings Document Bull Run Hydroelectric Project 10/22/2003
